Utah statutes.
58-68-806.   Representation of medical specialization.

(1)  A physician may not represent to another person that the physician is certified in a medical specialty or certified by a particular board unless:

(a)  the physician includes in the representation the name of:

(i)  the certification board or entity; and

(ii)  the medical specialty or procedure for which the physician is certified; and

(b)  the board or certification entity meets the requirements of Subsection (2).

(2)  A certification entity or board under Subsection (1) shall meet the following qualifications:

(a)  be included in the American Board of Medical Specialties or an American Osteopathic Association Certifying Board; or

(b) (i)  require an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or American Osteopathic Association approved post-graduate training program that provides complete training in the specialty or sub-specialty; and

(ii)  be certified or had prior certification by the member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties or an American Osteopathic Association Certifying Board.



Enacted by Chapter 162, 2012 General Session

